Missouri, session 2026, SB1041.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 67, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 67.115, to read as
follows:
67.115. 1. The board of education of a metropolitan
school district may impose a tax upon real property located
within the district for the purpose of funding special
educational services in the district. The tax shall not
exceed a rate of three cents per hundred dollars assessed
valuation and shall be imposed solely for the purpose of
funding special educational services in the district. The
tax authorized pursuant to this section shall not become
effective unless the board of education of the metropolitan
district submits to the voters residing within the district,
at a general election, a proposal to authorize the school
board of the metropolitan district to impose a tax under
this section.
2. The question of whether the tax authorized by this
section shall be imposed shall be submitted in substantially
the following form:
OFFICIAL BALLOT

SB 1041 2
Shall .......................... (name of
school district) impose a district-wide tax
on real property at a rate of ..... (insert
amount) cents per hundred dollars assessed
valuation for the purpose of funding special
educational services in the district?
□ YES □ NO
If you are in favor of the question, place
an "X" in the box opposite "YES". If you
are opposed to the question, place an "X" in
the box opposite "NO".
If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
question, the tax shall become effective. If a majority of
the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters
voting thereon are opposed to the question, the school board
of the metropolitan district may not impose the tax
authorized under this section unless and until the question
is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters
and such question is approved by a majority of the qualified
voters voting on the question.
3. All revenue collected pursuant to this section
shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which and shall
be known as the "Special Educational Services Property Tax
Trust Fund", and shall be used solely for the designated
purposes.
4. The provisions of chapter 137 and Article X,
Section 22 of the Missouri Constitution shall apply to the
tax authorized pursuant to this section.
✓